Utah statutes.
75-2a-122.   Effect of act.
The Advance Health Care Directive Act created in this chapter does not:
(1)  create a presumption concerning the intention of an adult who has not
made or who has revoked an advance health care directive;
(2)  authorize mercy killing, assisted suicide, or euthanasia; or
(3)  authorize the provision, withholding, or withdrawal of health care, to
the extent prohibited by the laws of this state.
